test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_kiela_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# ok

Tests:

  Noun - suonâ:
    suonâ+N+Sg+Nom: suoṇâ
    suonâ+N+Sg+Gen: suonâ
    suonâ+N+Sg+Acc: suonâ
    suonâ+N+Sg+Ill: suoṇân
    suonâ+N+Sg+Loc: suonâst
    suonâ+N+Sg+Com: suonáin
    suonâ+N+Sg+Abe: suoˊnâttáá
    suonâ+N+Ess: suonnân
    suonâ+N+Par: suonnâd
    suonâ+N+Pl+Nom: suonah
    suonâ+N+Pl+Gen: [suonâi, suoˊnâi]
    suonâ+N+Pl+Acc: suonâid
    suonâ+N+Pl+Ill: suonáid 
    suonâ+N+Pl+Loc: suonâin
    suonâ+N+Pl+Com: suoˊnâiguin
    suonâ+N+Pl+Abe: suoˊnâittáá

  Noun - muorâ:
    muorâ+N+Sg+Nom: muoṛâ
    muorâ+N+Sg+Gen: muorâ
    muorâ+N+Sg+Acc: muorâ
    muorâ+N+Sg+Ill: muoṛân
    muorâ+N+Sg+Loc: muorâst
    muorâ+N+Sg+Com: muoráin
    muorâ+N+Sg+Abe: muoˊrâttáá
    muorâ+N+Ess: muorrân
    muorâ+N+Par: muorrâd
    muorâ+N+Pl+Nom: muorah
    muorâ+N+Pl+Gen: [muorâi, muoˊrâi]
    muorâ+N+Pl+Acc: muorâid
    muorâ+N+Pl+Ill: muoráid 
    muorâ+N+Pl+Loc: muorâin
    muorâ+N+Pl+Com: muoˊrâiguin
    muorâ+N+Pl+Abe: muoˊrâittáá

  Noun - saahâ:
    saahâ+N+Sg+Nom: saahâ
    saahâ+N+Sg+Gen: saaṿâ
    saahâ+N+Sg+Acc: saaṿâ
    saahâ+N+Sg+Ill: saahân
    saahâ+N+Sg+Loc: saaṿâst
    saahâ+N+Sg+Com: savváin
    saahâ+N+Sg+Abe: saˊṿâttáá
    saahâ+N+Ess: saahân
    saahâ+N+Par: saahâd
    saahâ+N+Pl+Nom: saaṿah
    saahâ+N+Pl+Gen: [saaṿâi, saˊṿâi] 
    saahâ+N+Pl+Acc: saaṿâid
    saahâ+N+Pl+Ill: savváid
    saahâ+N+Pl+Loc: saaṿâin
    saahâ+N+Pl+Com: saˊṿâiguin
    saahâ+N+Pl+Abe: saˊṿâittáá
